District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.12

Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances.

If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of specific identifying information, that information must be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or the public. After a hearing in which a tribunal takes into consideration the health, safety, or liberty of the party or child, the tribunal may order disclosure of information that the tribunal determines to be in the interest of justice.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 311, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 312, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(12), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-303.11 and § 46-306.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.11.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.11

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “§ 46-303.11. Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances. ”Upon a finding, which may be made ex parte, that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be unreasonably put at risk by the disclosure of identifying information, or if an existing order so provides, a tribunal shall order that the address of the child or party or other identifying information not be disclosed in a pleading or other document filed in a proceeding under this chapter.”

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.12 has been recodified as § 46-303.13 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(13).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 312 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).